Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1,129
Emergencies; laws applicable.

Any day on which a bank, or any one or more of its offices, is closed during all or any part of its normal banking hours pursuant to the authorization granted under sections 8-1,124 to 8-1,129 shall be, with respect to such bank or, if not all of its offices are closed, with respect to any office or offices which are closed, a legal holiday for all purposes with respect to any banking business of any character. No liability, or loss of rights of any kind, on the part of any bank, or director, officer, or employee thereof, shall accrue or result by virtue of any closing authorized by sections 8-1,124 to 8-1,129.

The provisions of sections 8-1,124 to 8-1,129 shall be construed and applied as being in addition to, and not in substitution for or limitation of, any other law of this state or of the United States authorizing the closing of a bank or excusing delay by a bank in the performance of its duties and obligations because of emergencies or conditions beyond its control or otherwise.

Laws 1971, LB 523, § 6.

Bank holidays, see sections 62-301 and 62-301.01.